Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.245

Notification of noncompliance.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the state board of education if any private school authorized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.690 that is also approved by the state board of education under chapter 28A.195 RCW is investigated for noncompliance, is directed to complete corrective action, or fails to maintain authorization.

(2) The state board of education shall notify the office of the superintendent of public instruction of any unresolved concerns, deficiencies, or deviations related to a private school authorized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.690 that is also approved by the state board of education under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

[ 2023 c 436 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 436: See note following RCW 28A.300.690.